Tennessee, session 114, HB1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-724(a)(4), is amended by
deleting "one and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)" and substituting
"seventy-five hundredths percent (0.75%)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-724(b)(4), is amended by
deleting "one and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)" and substituting
"seventy-five hundredths percent (0.75%)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1506, is amended by deleting
"one and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)" and substituting "seventy-five
hundredths percent (0.75%)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-3203(d)(2), is amended by
deleting "one and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)" and substituting
"seventy-five hundredths percent (0.75%)".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-710(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting instead:
(2) The department shall remit the proceeds of the tax to the county, city, or
town levying the tax, less seventy-five hundredths percent (0.75%) of the tax to cover its
expenses of administering the collection and distribution of the tax.
HB1329
002822
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-710, is amended by deleting
subsection (h) in its entirety.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-7-110(b), is amended by deleting
"one and one hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (1.125%)" and substituting "seventy-five
hundredths percent (0.75%)".
SECTION 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to tax collections received on or after that date.
- 2 - 002822